Utah statutes.
63A-5-222.   Critical land near state prison -- Definitions -- Preservation
as open land -- Management and use of land -- Restrictions on transfer --
Wetlands development -- Conservation easement.
(1)  For purposes of this section:
(a)  "Corrections" means the Department of Corrections created under Section
64-13-2.
(b)  "Critical land" means:
(i)  a parcel of approximately 250 acres of land owned by the division and
located on the east edge of the Jordan River between about 12300 South and
14600 South in Salt Lake County, approximately the southern half of whose
eastern boundary abuts the Denver and Rio Grande Western Railroad right-of-
way; and
(ii)  any parcel acquired in a transaction authorized under Subsection (3)(c)
as a replacement for a portion of the parcel described in Subsection (1)(b)(i)
that is conveyed as part of the transaction.
(c) (i)  "Open land" means land that is:
(A)  preserved in or restored to a predominantly natural, open, and
undeveloped condition; and
(B)  used for:
(I)  wildlife habitat;
(II)  cultural or recreational use;
(III)  watershed protection; or
(IV)  another use consistent with the preservation of the land in or
restoration of the land to a predominantly natural, open, and undeveloped
condition.
(ii) (A)  "Open land" does not include land whose predominant use is as a
developed facility for active recreational activities, including baseball,
tennis, soccer, golf, or other sporting or similar activity.
(B)  The condition of land does not change from a natural, open, and
undeveloped condition because of the development or presence on the land of
facilities, including trails, waterways, and grassy areas, that:
(I)  enhance the natural, scenic, or aesthetic qualities of the land; or
(II)  facilitate the public's access to or use of the land for the enjoyment
of its natural, scenic, or aesthetic qualities and for compatible recreational
activities.
(2) (a) (i)  The critical land shall be preserved in perpetuity as open land.
(ii)  The long-term ownership and management of the critical land should
eventually be turned over to the Department of Natural Resources created under
Section 79-2-201 or another agency or entity that is able to accomplish the
purposes and intent of this section.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a)(i) and as funding is available, certain
actions should be taken on or with respect to the critical land, including:
(i)  the development and implementation of a program to eliminate noxious
vegetation and restore and facilitate the return of natural vegetation on the
critical land;
(ii)  the development of a system of trails through the critical land that is
compatible with the preservation of the critical land as open land;
(iii)  the development and implementation of a program to restore the natural
features of and improve the flows of the Jordan River as it crosses the
critical land;
(iv)  the preservation of the archeological site discovered on the critical
land and the development of an interpretive site in connection with the
archeological discovery;
(v)  in restoring features on the critical land, the adoption of methods and
plans that will enhance the critical land's function as a wildlife habitat;
(vi)  taking measures to reduce safety risks on the critical land; and
(vii)  the elimination or rehabilitation of a prison dump site on the critical
land.
(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (3)(b) and (c), no interest in the
critical land may be sold, assigned, leased, or otherwise transferred unless
measures are taken to ensure that the critical land that is transferred will
be preserved as open land in perpetuity.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a), exchanges of property may be
undertaken to resolve boundary disputes with adjacent property owners and
easements may be granted for trails and other purposes consistent with
Subsection (2)(b) and with the preservation of the critical land as open land.
(c)  The Department of Natural Resources may transfer title to a portion of
the critical land described in Subsection (1)(b)(i) in exchange for a parcel
of land if:
(i)  the parcel being acquired is:
(A)  open land; and
(B)  located within one mile of the portion of critical land being
transferred; and
(ii)  the purpose of the exchange is to facilitate the development of a
commuter rail transit station and associated transit oriented development.
(4)  The division shall use the funds remaining from the appropriation under
Laws of Utah 1998, Chapter 399, for the purposes of:
(a)  determining the boundaries and legal description of the critical land;
(b)  determining the boundaries and legal description of the adjacent property
owned by the division;
(c)  fencing the critical land and adjacent land owned by the division where
appropriate and needed; and
(d)  assisting to carry out the intent of this section.
(5) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a)(i), the division or its successor
in title to the critical land may develop or allow a public agency or private
entity to develop more wetlands on the critical land than exist naturally or
existed previously.
(b) (i)  Subject to Subsections (3)(a) and (5)(b)(ii), the division or its
successor in title may transfer jurisdiction of all or a portion of the
critical land to a public agency or private entity to provide for the
development and management of wetlands and designated wetland buffer areas.
(ii)  Before transferring jurisdiction of any part of the critical land under
Subsection (5)(b)(i), the division or its successor in title shall assure that
reasonable efforts are made to obtain approval from the appropriate federal
agency to allow mitigation credits in connection with the critical land to be
used for impacts occurring anywhere along the Wasatch Front.
(6)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, corrections shall
have access to the cooling pond located on the critical land as long as that
access to and use of the cooling pond are not inconsistent with the
preservation of the critical land as open land.
(7)  The Department of Corrections, the division, and all other state
departments, divisions, or agencies shall cooperate together to carry out the
intent of this section.
(8)  In order to ensure that the land referred to in this section is preserved
as open land, the division shall, as soon as practicable, place the land under
a perpetual conservation easement in favor of an independent party such as a
reputable land conservation organization or a state or local government agency
with experience in conservation easements.
